California, session 20252026, SB932.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 369.6 is added to the Code of Civil Procedure, to read:369.6. An assignee who has been assigned rights in a proceeding by an assignor who is the original real party in interest in the proceeding shall identify the assignor and original real party in interest in the title of the case on the first document the assignee files in the proceeding.